Nevada, session 83, AB392.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 277 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a tribal government wishes to enter into an agreement
for joint or cooperative action or contract with the governing body
of a county or agency thereof, pursuant to the provisions of this
section and NRS 277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, within which tribal
land of the tribal government is located, partially or wholly, for the
performance of any governmental service, activity or undertaking
which the tribal government, county or agency thereof is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
authorized by law to perform, the governing body of the county
may, on behalf of the county or agency thereof, engage in
discussions in good faith with the tribal government for the
performance of such services.
2. If the governing body of a county or agency thereof enters
into an agreement or contract pursuant to the provisions of this
section and NRS 277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, such an agreement
must be a conditional interlocal agreement which:
(a) Must not require a tribal government to waive sovereign
immunity; and
(b) Must authorize the governing body of the county or agency
thereof to terminate the agreement by providing the tribal
government with 90 days’ advance written notice, upon the
occurrence of any of the following conditions:
(1) The tribal government is more than 60 days delinquent
on its financial obligations under the agreement;
(2) The tribal government fails to respond for more than 90
days to a written demand by the governing body of the county or
agency thereof to perform under the agreement;
(3) An authorized representative of the tribal government
or tribal council or tribal police of the tribal government prevents
entry onto the tribal land or otherwise prevents the county or
agency thereof, or any employee or agent of the county or agency,
from otherwise performing under the agreement; or
(4) The tribal government enters into any subsequent
agreement pursuant to this section and NRS 277.080 to 277.180,
inclusive, which materially conflicts with the existing agreement.
3. For the purposes of this section, an agency of a county
does not include any water authority, water district or water
reclamation district.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Good faith” means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable standards of fair dealing.
(b) “Tribal government” means the governing body of an
Indian tribe, group of tribes, organized segment of a tribe or any
organization representing two or more such entities.
Sec. 2. NRS 277.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.080 NRS 277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act may be cited as the Interlocal Cooperation Act.
Sec. 3. NRS 277.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.090 It is the purpose of NRS 277.080 to 277.180,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act to permit local governments to
make the most efficient use of their powers by enabling them to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
cooperate with other local governments on a basis of mutual
advantage and thereby to provide services and facilities in a manner
and pursuant to forms of governmental organization which will best
accord with geographic, economic, population and other factors
influencing the needs and development of local communities.
Sec. 4. NRS 277.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.100 As used in NRS 277.080 to 277.180, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Public agency” means:
(a) Any political subdivision of this State, including without
limitation counties, incorporated cities and towns, including Carson
City, unincorporated towns, school districts and other districts.
(b) Any agency of this State or of the United States.
(c) Any political subdivision of another state.
(d) Any Indian tribe, group of tribes, organized segment of a
tribe, or any organization representing two or more such entities.
2. “State” includes any of the United States and the District of
Columbia.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)